District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2401.13

Payment of water tax into General Fund.

Repealed.

R.S., D.C., § 203
Jan. 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42, § 3(d), 22 DCR 6313
July 23, 1992, D.C. Law 9-134, § 112(g), 39 DCR 4066
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 113(d), 39 DCR 4895
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 113(d), 39 DCR 4895
1981 Ed., § 43-1532.
1973 Ed., § 43-1523.